Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-109
Division; powers; rules and regulations; applicability to federal government.

The division may (1) perform such acts, (2) issue and amend such orders, (3) adopt and promulgate such reasonable general or special rules, regulations, and procedure, and (4) establish such minimum standards, consistent with the State Aeronautics Act, as it shall deem necessary to carry out the act and to perform its duties under the act as commensurate with and for the purpose of protecting and insuring the general public interest and safety, the safety of persons receiving instruction concerning, or operating, using, or traveling in aircraft, and of persons and property on land or water, and to develop and promote aeronautics in this state. No rule or regulation of the division shall apply to airports or other air navigation facilities owned or controlled by the federal government within this state.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(3), p. 83;

Laws 1947, c. 9, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 9.
July 1, 2017
1947 amendment to this section was unconstitutional. State ex rel. State Railway Commission v. Ramsey, 151 Neb. 333, 37 N.W.2d 502 (1949).